South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S449.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-43-30(50) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (50) "Practice of pharmacy" means the: (a) interpretation, evaluation, and dispensing of prescription drug orders in the patient's best interest; (b) participation in drug and device selection, drug administration, prospective drug reviews, and drug or drug-related research; (c) provision of patient counseling and the provision of those acts or services necessary to provide pharmacy care and drug therapy management; (d) responsibility for compounding and labeling of drugs and devices, (except labeling by a manufacturer, repackager, or distributor or nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend drugs and devices) proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and maintenance of proper records for them; (e) initiation, ordering, and administration of flu and COVID tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement amendments (CLIA) of 1988 and authorized by the Food and Drug Administration for influenza, SARS-COV-2, streptococcal pharyngitis, and others as approved by the Board of Medical Examiners and Board of Pharmacy. Pharmacists may delegate the task of administering tests provided for in this subsection to a trained pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern, but the pharmacist must perform any interpretation of the results; (f) initiate treatment of conditions identified in subitem (e) pursuant to identical joint written protocol issued by the Board of Medical Examiners and the Board of Pharmacy which must be issued within ninety days of the effective date of this subitem and updated as needed but no less than annually; (f)(g) reporting of a person's flu or COVID test resultsreporting of tests performed pursuant to subitem (e) and treatment provided pursuant to subitem (f) and the referral of that patient for follow-up care to the health care provider identified by the patient or if none is identified, to an appropriate health care provider as needed;  or (g)(h) the offering or performing of those acts, services, operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct, operation, education, management, and control of pharmacy. SECTION 2.  Section 40-43-30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (62) "Collaborative practice agreement" means a written agreement between a pharmacist and a physician, both of whom are licensed and in good standing in this State, actively practicing, and physically located within the geographic boundaries of this State, that sets out a plan to provide evidence-based medication management services and other related patient care services that support the treatment goals established by the physician including, but not limited to, monitoring, education, and assessments for specifically identified patients delegated to the pharmacist by the physician responsible for treating the patients. The pharmacist and the physician must have access to the same electronic medical records system or, if that is not practicable, must develop a HIPAA-compliant method to share written medical records to document regular, secure, and timely communication between the physician and the pharmacist to ensure coordinated patient care. SECTION 3.  Chapter 43, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-43-245. Pharmacists are authorized to enter into collaborative practice agreements with physicians. SECTION 4.  Section 40-47-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (60) "Collaborative practice agreement" means a written agreement between a pharmacist and a physician, both of whom are licensed and in good standing in this State, actively practicing, and physically located within the geographic boundaries of this State, that sets out a plan to provide evidence-based medication management services and other related patient care services that support the treatment goals established by the physician including, but not limited to, monitoring, education, and assessments for specifically identified patients delegated to the pharmacist by the physician responsible for treating the patients. The pharmacist and the physician must have access to the same electronic medical records system or, if that is not practicable, must develop a HIPAA-compliant method to share written medical records to document regular, secure, and timely communication between the physician and the pharmacist to ensure coordinated patient care. SECTION 5.  Chapter 47, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-47-205. Physicians are authorized to enter into collaborative practice agreements with pharmacists. SECTION 6.  The State Board of Pharmacy and the State Board of Medical Examiners shall each promulgate regulations governing the use of collaborative practice agreements. Collaborative practice agreements may not be implemented until the effective date of the regulations promulgated pursuant to this section. SECTION 7.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----